Utah statutes.
61-2f-207.   Change of information -- Failure to notify.

(1)  An applicant, licensee, registrant, or certificate holder shall send the division a signed statement in the form required by the division notifying the division within 10 business days of any change of:

(a)  principal broker;

(b)  principal business location;

(c)  mailing address;

(d)  home street address;

(e)  an individual's name; or

(f)  business name.

(2)  The division may charge a fee established by the commission with the concurrence of the division in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for processing any notification of change submitted by an applicant, licensee, registrant, or certificate holder.

(3) (a)  When providing the division a business location or home street address, a physical location or street address must be provided.

(b)  When providing a mailing address, an applicant, licensee, registrant, or certificate holder may provide a post office box or other mail drop location.

(4)  Failure to notify the division of a change described in Subsection (1) is separate grounds for disciplinary action against an applicant, licensee, registrant, or certificate holder.

(5)  An applicant, licensee, registrant, or certificate holder is considered to have received any notification that has been sent to the last address furnished to the division by the applicant, licensee, registrant, or certificate holder.

